Hawaii, session 2026, HB208.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Section 281-20, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended to read as follows: "§281-20 General right of inspection[.]; unannounced visits. Any investigator may, at all times, without notice and without any search warrant or other legal process, visit and have immediate access to every part of the premises of every licensee for the purpose of making any examination or inspection thereof or inquiry into the books and records therein, to ascertain whether all of the conditions of the license and all provisions of this chapter are being complied with by the licensee.  Inspections shall be conducted on an annual basis and at such intervals as determined by the board to ensure the health, safety, and welfare of the public. Unannounced visits may be conducted during regular business hours.  All inspections relating to follow-up visits, visits to confirm correction of deficiencies, or visits to investigate complaints shall be conducted unannounced." SECTION 2.  Section 281-31, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended as follows: 1.  By amending subsection (f) to read: "(f)  Class 5. Dispenser license. (1)  A license under this class shall authorize the licensee to sell liquor specified in this subsection for consumption on the premises.  A licensee under this class shall be issued a license according to the category of establishment the licensee owns or operates.  The categories of establishments shall be as follows: (A)  A standard bar; (B)  Premises in which a person performs or entertains unclothed or in attire restricted to use by entertainers pursuant to commission rules; or (C)  Premises in which live entertainment or recorded music is provided; provided that facilities for dancing by the patrons may be permitted as provided by commission rules[; or (D)  Premises in which employees or entertainers are compensated to sit with patrons, regardless of whether the employees or entertainers are consuming nonalcoholic beverages while in the company of the patrons pursuant to commission rules]. (2)  If a licensee under class 5 desires to change the category of establishment the licensee owns or operates, the licensee shall apply for a new license applicable to the category of the licensee's establishment. (3)  Of this class, there shall be the following kinds: (A)  General (includes all liquor except alcohol); (B)  Beer and wine; and (C)  Beer." 2.  By amending subsection (k) to read: "(k)  Class 11. Cabaret license.  A cabaret license shall be general only but shall exclude alcohol and shall authorize the sale of liquor for consumption on the premises. A cabaret license shall be issued only for premises where [food is served,] facilities for dancing by the patrons including a dance floor are provided[,] and live or amplified recorded music or professional entertainment, except professional entertainment by a person who performs or entertains unclothed, is provided for the patrons; provided that professional entertainment by persons who perform or entertain unclothed shall be authorized by: (1)  A cabaret license for premises where professional entertainment by persons who perform or entertain unclothed was presented on a regular and consistent basis immediately prior to June 15, 1990; or (2)  A cabaret license that, pursuant to rules adopted by the liquor commission, permits professional entertainment by persons who perform or entertain unclothed. A cabaret license under paragraph (1) or (2) authorizing professional entertainment by persons who perform or entertain unclothed shall be transferable through June 30, 2000.  A cabaret license under paragraph (1) or (2) authorizing professional entertainment by persons who perform or entertain unclothed shall not be transferable after June 30, 2000, except upon approval by the liquor commission and pursuant to rules adopted by the commission.  Notwithstanding any rule of the liquor commission to the contrary, cabarets in resort areas may be opened for the transaction of business until 4 a.m. throughout the entire week.  A cabaret license shall not be issued for any premises located within an apartment mixed use subprecinct within a special improvement or special district in which the economy is primarily based on tourism." SECTION 3.  Section 281-79, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended to read as follows: "§281-79 Entry for examination; obstructing liquor commission operations; penalty.  Every investigator shall, and any police officer [having police power] may, at all reasonable times, and at any time whatsoever if there is any reasonable ground for suspicion that the conditions of any license are being violated, without warrant enter into and upon any licensed premises and inspect the same and every part thereof, and any books or records therein, to ascertain whether or not all conditions of the license and all provisions of this chapter are being complied with by the licensee. If any investigator or officer, or any person called by the investigator or officer to the investigator's or officer's aid, is threatened with the use of violence, force, or physical interference or obstacle, or is hindered, obstructed, or prevented by any licensee, the licensee's employees, or any other person from entering into the premises, or whenever any investigator or officer is by any licensee, the licensee's employees, or any other person opposed, obstructed, or molested in the performance of the officer's duty in any respect, the licensee, the licensee's employee, or any other person shall be fined not more than $2,000 or imprisoned not more than one year, or both. Whenever any investigator or police officer, having demanded admittance into any licensed premises and declared the investigator's or police officer's name and office, is not admitted by the licensee or the person in charge of the premises, it shall be lawful for the investigator or police officer to [forcibly and in any manner to break into and] use reasonable force to enter the premises." SECTION 4.  This Act does not affect rights and duties that matured, penalties that were incurred, and proceedings that were begun before its effective date. SECTION 5.  Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 6.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________